Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Part 1

General Provisions

3-1-101. Composition.

The general assembly shall consist of a senate composed of thirty-three (33) members and a house of representatives composed of ninety-nine (99) members, to be apportioned among the qualified voters of the several counties and districts as provided in §§3-1-102 and3-1-103.

Acts 1965 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 2; modified; T.C.A., § 3-101.

Cross-References. Disqualification of members to act as sheriff, §8-8-101.

Election contests over office of governor, decided by general assembly, title 2, ch. 18.

Election of members, time for holding, §2-3-203.

Legislative internship program, title 49, ch. 50, part 6.

Members of general assembly, nomination in primary, §2-13-202.

Number of representatives, Tenn. Const., art. II, § 5.

Number of senators, Tenn. Const., art. II, § 6.

Official misconduct, §39-16-402.

State purchases law, exemption of general assembly from, §12-3-102.

Statements as to campaign expenditures, title 2, ch. 10, part 1.

Vacancies in office, special election held to fill, title 2, ch. 14, part 2.

Law Reviews.

The First Amendment and Distributional Voting Rights Controversies (Emily M. Calhoun), 52 Tenn. L. Rev. 549 (1985).

3-1-102. Composition of state senatorial districts.

Senators elected to the One Hundred Seventh General Assembly shall, until the next general election for senators, represent their respective districts as constituted prior to February 9, 2012. Nothing in this section shall be construed as depriving any member of the senate of the One Hundred Seventh General Assembly of such member's office, or as affecting or modifying the constitutional requirement of staggered senatorial terms, or as affecting or modifying any other provisions of article II, § 3 of the Constitution of Tennessee. At the November 2012 general election, and thereafter until changed by law, senators shall be elected to represent the districts as constituted and provided by this section. On the date of such November 2012 general election and thereafter until changed by law, senators shall represent the districts as constituted and provided by this section. If an election is required prior to the general election in November 2012, to fill a vacancy in accordance with article II, § 15(a) of the Constitution of Tennessee, then the election to fill the vacancy shall be held in the district as constituted and provided prior to February 9, 2012.

All census descriptions, counties, voting districts (VTDs), whether designated as precincts, wards, council districts, or otherwise, tracts, blocks, census delineations, census district lines and other census designations are those established for or by the United States department of commerce, bureau of the census, for taking the 2010 federal decennial census in Tennessee as contained in the automated geographic database, known as the TIGER (topologically integrated geographic encoding and referencing) system.

As provided in subsection (d), each district is described county by county in alphabetical order and, if a county is split, by the portion of such split county. Split counties are described by VTDs and, if further divided, by census blocks.

Any reapportionment of county legislative bodies shall not affect these legislative districts.

Until the next enumeration of qualified voters and apportionment of senators, the state senatorial districts shall be composed as follows:

District 01:

Cocke County

Greene County

Hamblen County

Sevier County

VTD: 1-1 Caton's Chapel

VTD: 11-2 Pittman Center City Hall

VTD: 1-2 Jones Cove

VTD: 3-1 New Center

Blocks (080602): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1106 2027 3006 3008 3012 4059 4060 4073 4074 4075 4076 4077 4078 4079 4080 4081 4082 4083 4084 4085 4086 4087 4088 4089 4090 4091 4092 4093 4094 4095 4096 4097 4099 4101

VTD: 7-1 Voting Machine Warehouse

Blocks (080602): 4002 4003 4006 4033 4038 4040 4041 4042 4043 4045 4046 4047 4048 4049 4050 4051 4053 4054 4055 4056 4057 4058 4069 4070 4071 4100

VTD: 7-2 Catlettsburg

Blocks (080102): 3073 3074 3092 3093

Blocks (080602): 4000 4001 4004 4005 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4025 4027 4028 4030 4031 4032 4034 4035 4036 4037 4039 4044 4052 4061 4064 4065 4066 4098

VTD: 8-1 Kodak

VTD: 8-2 Underwood;

District 02:

Blount County

Sevier County

VTD: 10-1 Boyd's Creek Elementary School

VTD: 10-2 DuPont Community Center

VTD: 10-3 Adult H.S. (Whites)

VTD: 11-1 Gatlinburg Amer. Legion

VTD: 2-1 Waldens Creek

VTD: 2-2 Wearwood School

VTD: 3-1 New Center

Blocks (080602): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2034 2035 2039 2040 2041 2043 2044 3007 3009 3010 3011 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3050

Blocks (080700): 1055 1056 1057

VTD: 3-2 Vocational Ctr. Harrisbg.

VTD: 4-1 Pigeon Forge City Hall

VTD: 5-1 Sevierville Middle School

VTD: 5-2 Senior Citizens Bldg.

VTD: 6-1 Seymour Intmdte. School

VTD: 7-1 Voting Machine Warehouse

Blocks (080400): 1071 1072 1073 1074 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1135 1142

Blocks (080500): 3009 3010 3011 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3029 3031 3035 3036 3039 3043 3044 3045 3046 3082 3083

Blocks (080601): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1030 1031 1032 1035 1036 1038 1039 1040 1041 1046 1047 1048 1056 1057 2099 2100 2101 2102 2105 2106 2107 2108 2109 2110 2111 2112 2113 2114 2115 2116 2117 2118 2119 2120 2121 2122 2123 2124 2125 2126 2130 2131 2132 2133 2134 2135 2138 2139 2140 2141 2142 2143 2144 2145 2148 2149 2150 2152 2153 2154 2155 2156

Blocks (080602): 3037 3047 3048

VTD: 7-2 Catlettsburg

Blocks (080102): 1052 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 3046 3051 3078 3079 3080 3081 3082 3083 3084 3085 3086 3087 3088 3089 3090 3091

Blocks (080400): 1000 1001 1002 1008 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1028 1029 1030 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1075 1083 1138 1139 1140 1141

Blocks (080500): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3012

Blocks (080601): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071 2072 2073 2074 2075 2076 2077 2078 2079 2080 2081 2082 2083 2084 2085 2086 2087 2088 2089 2090 2091 2092 2093 2094 2095 2096 2097 2098 2103 2104 2127 2128 2129 2136 2137 2146 2147 2151 2157 2158

Blocks (080602): 4024 4026 4029 4062 4063 4067 4068 4072

VTD: 9-1 Seymour Primary School;

District 03:

Carter County

VTD: Central

VTD: Court House

VTD: Eastside

VTD: Elk Mills

VTD: Gap Creek

VTD: Hampton

VTD: Happy Valley

VTD: Harold McCormick

VTD: High School

VTD: Little Milligan

VTD: Range

Blocks (071100): 1069 1071 1072 1079 1088

Blocks (071200): 2060 2061 2062 2063

VTD: Roan Mountain

VTD: Siam

VTD: Tiger Valley

VTD: Valley Forge

VTD: Watauga

Blocks (071100): 1070

VTD: Westside

Unicoi County

Washington County;

District 04:

Carter County

VTD: Hunter

VTD: Keenburg

VTD: Midway

VTD: Range

Blocks (071100): 1012 1016 1019 1024 1073 1074

Blocks (071200): 2041 2042 2043 2048 2049 2050 2064 2065 2075 2076

VTD: Unaka

VTD: Watauga

Blocks (071000): 1000 1001 1005

Blocks (071100): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1014 1015 1017 1018 1020 1021 1022 1023 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1080 1081 1082 1083 1085 1086 1087

Blocks (071200): 1007 1016

Johnson County

Sullivan County;

District 05:

Anderson County

Knox County

VTD: 18 Lincoln Park

VTD: 19 S.O.A.R. Youth Ministries

VTD: 20 Beaumont

VTD: 37 Inskip Elementary

VTD: 38 Inskip Elementary

VTD: 39 Inskip Recreation Center

VTD: 56 Heiskell

VTD: 57 Hills

VTD: 58 Pedigo

Blocks (006205): 2000 2001 2002

Blocks (006301): 1039 1040 1041 1042 1057 1058 1060 1062 1063 1064

VTD: 62 Hardin Valley

VTD: 62W Hardin Valley West

VTD: 63N Karns North

VTD: 64 Solway

VTD: 72E Boys and Girls Club

VTD: 72M Boys and Girls Club

VTD: 72W Boys and Girls Club

VTD: 73 Powell

Loudon County;

District 06:

Knox County

VTD: 12 Eastport

VTD: 13 Fair Garden

VTD: 14E Austin-East

VTD: 14M Walter P. Taylor Center

VTD: 15 John T. O'Connor Center

VTD: 24N Pellissippi State Tech

VTD: 24Q Sequoyah Hills

VTD: 25 South Knox Community Center

VTD: 26 Dogwood

VTD: 27 South Knox Optimist Club

VTD: 28 South-Doyle Middle

VTD: 29 Anderson

VTD: 30 Sarah Moore Greene

VTD: 31 Chilhowee

VTD: 32 Spring Hill

VTD: 48 Pond Gap

VTD: 49 Bearden Elementary

VTD: 50S West High

VTD: 51 Deane Hill Recreation Center

VTD: 60 Fort Sumpter

VTD: 61 Halls

VTD: 65 Concord

VTD: 69N A.L. Lotts

VTD: 69S Bluegrass

VTD: 71 Rocky Hill

VTD: 74 Shannondale

VTD: 75 Huffs

VTD: 76 Sunnyview

VTD: 77 Ramsey

VTD: 78 Riverdale

VTD: 79 Dora Kennedy

VTD: 80 Corryton

VTD: 81 Gibbs

VTD: 82 Ellistown

VTD: 84 Ritta

VTD: 85 Skaggston

VTD: 86 Carter

VTD: 87 Thorngrove

VTD: 88 Kings

VTD: 89 Mt.Olive

VTD: 90 Bonny Kate

VTD: 91 Vestal

VTD: 92 Gap Creek

VTD: 93 Hopewell;

District 07:

Knox County

VTD: 06 Green School

VTD: 09 Moses Center

VTD: 10N Fort Sanders

VTD: 10S Stokley Athletics Center

VTD: 11 Central United Methodist Church

VTD: 16N North Knox Recreation Center

VTD: 16S Belle Morris

VTD: 17 Christenberry

VTD: 23N Bible Church of God

VTD: 23S Westview

VTD: 33 Richard Yoakley

VTD: 34 Fountain City Library

VTD: 35 Shannondale

VTD: 36 Gresham

VTD: 40 Norwood Elementary

VTD: 41 Norwood Library

VTD: 42 Pleasant Ridge

VTD: 43 West Haven

VTD: 44 Ridgedale

VTD: 45 Bearden Middle

VTD: 46 West Hills

VTD: 47 Bearden High

VTD: 50N West High

VTD: 55 Lonas

VTD: 58 Pedigo

Blocks (006205): 1006 1007 1008 1009 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014

Blocks (006206): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1013 1020 1022 1023 1024 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006

Blocks (006301): 1059 1065 1066 1067

VTD: 59 Brickey

VTD: 63 Karns

VTD: 65N Concord North

VTD: 66N Farragut I

VTD: 66S Farragut II

VTD: 67 North Cedar Bluff

VTD: 68 South Cedar Bluff

VTD: 68E East Cedar Bluff

VTD: 70 Ball Camp;

District 08:

Claiborne County

Grainger County

Hancock County

Hawkins County

Jefferson County

Union County;

District 09:

Bradley County

VTD: 102-1 Prospect

VTD: 103-1 Hopewell

VTD: 201-1 E.L. Ross

VTD: 301-1 Lee University

VTD: 302-1 Senior Center

VTD: 501-1 T.C. Bower

VTD: 502-1 Community Serv

VTD: 701 Stuart

VTD: 702 Cleveland High

McMinn County

Meigs County

Monroe County

Polk County;

District 10:

Bradley County

VTD: 101-1 McDonald

VTD: 202-1 Charleston

VTD: 401 Oak Grove

VTD: 402 Michigan Avenue

VTD: 601-1 Valley View

VTD: 602-1 Blue Spring

VTD: 603-1 Waterville

VTD: 604-1 Black Fox

Hamilton County

VTD: 002 Alton Park

VTD: 003 Amnicola

VTD: 004 Avondale

VTD: 006 Brainerd

VTD: 007 Brainerd Hills

VTD: 008 Bushtown

VTD: 009 Cedar Hill

VTD: 011 Clifton Hills 1

VTD: 012 Concord 1

VTD: 013 Courthouse

VTD: 014 Dalewood

VTD: 015 Downtown

VTD: 017 East Brainerd 1

VTD: 018 East Chattanooga 1

VTD: 019 East Lake

VTD: 020 East Side 1

VTD: 021 Eastdale 1

VTD: 023 Glenwood

VTD: 024 Highland Park

VTD: 026 Howard

VTD: 031 Missionary Ridge

VTD: 032 Moccasin Bend

VTD: 035 North Chattanooga 1

VTD: 040 Piney Woods

VTD: 041 Ridgedale

VTD: 042 Riverview

VTD: 043 St Elmo 1

VTD: 044 Stuart Heights 1

VTD: 045 Sunnyside

VTD: 048 Lookout Valley 1

VTD: 049 Woodmore

VTD: 050 Apison 1

VTD: 053 East Ridge 1

VTD: 054 East Ridge 2

VTD: 055 East Ridge 3

VTD: 056 East Ridge 4

VTD: 057 East Ridge 5

VTD: 061 Ridgeside

VTD: 064 Westview 1

VTD: 072 Lookout Mountain 1

VTD: 076 Red Bank 1

VTD: 091 Westview 2

VTD: 092 Lookout Valley 2

VTD: 094 Eastgate 1

VTD: 095 Eastgate 2

VTD: 096 Westview 3

VTD: 104 East Brainerd 2

VTD: 111 Lookout Valley 3*

VTD: 117 Mountain Creek 4

VTD: 118 Apison 2

VTD: 121 Lookout Mountain 2

VTD: 125 Red Bank 4

VTD: 131 Eastdale 2

VTD: 132 East Side 2

VTD: 133 Clifton Hills 2

VTD: 137 St. Elmo 2

VTD: 138 St. Elmo 3

VTD: 139 North Chattanooga 2

VTD: 141 Concord 3

VTD: 160 St Elmo 4

VTD: 161 Lookout Valley 4;

District 11:

Hamilton County

VTD: 001 Airport 1

VTD: 005 Bonny Oaks

VTD: 016 DuPont

VTD: 025 Hixon 1

VTD: 027 Kingsport

VTD: 028 Lake Hills

VTD: 029 Lupton City

VTD: 033 Mountain Creek 1

VTD: 034 Murray Hills

VTD: 036 Northgate

VTD: 037 Northwoods 1

VTD: 038 Northwoods 2

VTD: 046 Tyner 1

VTD: 051 Birchwood

VTD: 052 Collegedale 1

VTD: 058 Harrison 1

VTD: 059 Meadowview

VTD: 060 Ooltewah 1

VTD: 062 Snowhill

VTD: 063 Summit

VTD: 065 Bakewell

VTD: 066 Dallas

VTD: 067 Fairmount

VTD: 068 Falling Water 1

VTD: 069 Flat Top Mountain

VTD: 070 Ganns

VTD: 071 Lakesite

VTD: 073 Middle Valley

VTD: 074 Mowbray

VTD: 075 Pleasant Grove 1

VTD: 077 Red Bank 2

VTD: 078 Red Bank 3

VTD: 080 Sale Creek

VTD: 081 Signal Mountain East

VTD: 082 Signal Mountain West

VTD: 083 Soddy Daisy 1

VTD: 084 Soddy Daisy 2

VTD: 085 Valdeau

VTD: 086 Walden

VTD: 088 Hixson 2

VTD: 089 Ooltewah 2

VTD: 090 Harrison 2

VTD: 093 Concord 2

VTD: 097 Tyner 2

VTD: 098 Harrison 3

VTD: 101 Hixson 3

VTD: 102 Northwoods 5

VTD: 103 Pleasant Grove 2

VTD: 106 Mountain Creek 2

VTD: 109 Falling Water 2

VTD: 112 Airport 2

VTD: 119 Northwoods 3

VTD: 122 Collegedale 2

VTD: 127 Red Bank 6

VTD: 130 Tyner 4

VTD: 140 Harrison 4

VTD: 143 Ooltewah 3*

VTD: 144 Soddy Daisy 3

VTD: 144 Stuart Heights 2

VTD: 148 Soddy Daisy 4

VTD: 154 Airport 4

VTD: 162 Northwoods 4*

VTD: 164 Hixson 4*

VTD: 165 Soddy Daisy 5*

VTD: 166 Summit 2;

District 12:

Campbell County

Fentress County

Morgan County

Pickett County

Rhea County

Roane County

Scott County;

District 13:

Rutherford County

VTD: 01-1 LaVergne City Hall

VTD: 01-2 Roy Waldron School

VTD: 02-2 Walter Hill School

Blocks (040501): 1000 1001 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 3026 3035 3036 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046

Blocks (040502): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1019 1020 1021 1023 1026 2009 2010 2011 2012

Blocks (041000): 1038 1041 1059

Blocks (041101): 3022 3023 3025 3026 3027 3067

VTD: 03-1 Leana Community Center

Blocks (040901): 2004 2030 2031 2052 2053 2054 2059

Blocks (041000): 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1044 1045 1046 1051 1053 1054 1055 1056 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2020 2021 2022 2023 2028 2029 3000 3001 3002 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3027 3029 3030 3033 4000 4001 4002 4003 4007 4008 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4019 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4032 4033 4034 4035 4036

VTD: 03-2 Nissan Activity Center

VTD: 03-3 Wilson Elementary School

Blocks (040403): 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4011 4012 4013 4014 4036 4037 4040 4044 4045

Blocks (040501): 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3037 3038 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4032 4033 4034 4035 4036

Blocks (042200): 3000 3001 3004 3021 3029

VTD: 03-4 Florence Baptist Church

VTD: 05-1 First Baptist Church of LaVergne

VTD: 07-1 Blackman Elementary School

VTD: 07-3 Middle TN Electric Membership Corp

VTD: 08-1 Blackman United Methodist Church

VTD: 08-2 Eagleville Community Center

VTD: 08-3 Lebanon Camp Church

VTD: 08-4 Rockvale Community Center

VTD: 09-1 Stewart Creek Elementary

VTD: 09-2 Giles Creek Baptist Church

VTD: 10-1 Cedar Grove Elementary

VTD: 10-2 Stewartsboro School

VTD: 10-3 Rock Springs School III

VTD: 11-1 Smyrna Middle School

VTD: 12-1 Tennessee Rehab Center

VTD: 13-1 Bellwood School

VTD: 13-2 World Outreach Church

VTD: 14-2 Siegal Elementary School

Blocks (041000): 1039 1040 1042 1043 1047 1048

Blocks (041301): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2013 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017

VTD: 16-1 Central Middle School

VTD: 16-2 Mitchell Neilson Elementary

VTD: 17-1 North Blvd Church of Christ

VTD: 18-1 Patterson Park

Blocks (041600): 3045 3046 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056 3057 3058 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4026 4027

Blocks (041800): 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3048 3050 3053 3054 3055 3057

Blocks (041900): 1000 1001 1002 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 3000 3001 3002 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022

Blocks (042000): 1004 1018 2000 2003 2004 2007 2008 2009 2012

Blocks (042100): 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1027 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034

VTD: 19-1 Mitchell Neilson Primary

VTD: 19-2 Seigel Middle School

VTD: 19-3 Lane Agri-Park

VTD: 20-1 Creekmont General Baptist Church

VTD: 20-2 Blackman Middle School;

District 14:

Bedford County

Lincoln County

Marshall County

Moore County

Rutherford County

VTD: 02-1 Lascassas School

VTD: 02-2 Walter Hill School

Blocks (040501): 1002 1003 1004 1013 1014 1016 1018 1019

Blocks (040502): 1018 1022 1024 1025 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024

Blocks (041000): 1000

Blocks (041101): 1035 1036 1038 1041 1042 1043 1044 1054 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2013 2014 2015 2016 2020 2026 2027 2034 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3014 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3024 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3037 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3048 3053 3054 3056 3057 3058 3059 3060 3061 3062 3063 3064 3065 3066 3068 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4025

VTD: 02-3 Milton Fire Hall

VTD: 03-1 Leana Community Center

Blocks (041000): 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 4018

VTD: 03-3 Wilson Elementary School

Blocks (040501): 1005 1015 1017 1020

VTD: 04-1 Advent Lutheran Church

VTD: 04-2 Bud's Tire Shop

VTD: 04-3 Kittrell School IV

VTD: 04-4 Oakland High School

VTD: 06-1 Buchanan School

VTD: 06-2 Christiana Middle School

VTD: 06-3 Kittrell School VI

VTD: 07-2 Riverdale High School

VTD: 14-1 Northfield Elementary School

VTD: 14-2 Siegal Elementary School

Blocks (041101): 2011 2012 2017 2018 2019 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2028 2031 2033 2035 3015 3034 3035 3036 3038 3052

VTD: 15-1 Kingwood Church of Christ

VTD: 18-1 Patterson Park

Blocks (042000): 3024

VTD: 18-2 Mid TN Realtors Association Bldg

VTD: 18-3 Wilderness Station III

VTD: 21-1 Hobgood School;

District 15:

Bledsoe County

Cumberland County

Jackson County

Overton County

Putnam County

White County;

District 16:

Coffee County

Franklin County

Grundy County

Marion County

Sequatchie County

Van Buren County

Warren County;

District 17:

Cannon County

Clay County

DeKalb County

Macon County

Smith County

Wilson County;

District 18:

Davidson County

VTD: 11-3 Andrew Jackson School

Blocks (010502): 3040 3041 3045 3046

Blocks (015401): 1000 1003 1004 1005 1006 1013 1014 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039

VTD: 11-4 DuPont-Tyler Middle School

VTD: 12-1 Hermitage Presby Church

VTD: 12-2 Ruby Major Elementary

VTD: 12-3 Dupont-Tyler Middle School

VTD: 12-4 Central Pike Church of Christ

VTD: 33-1 Eagle Christian Church

Sumner County

Trousdale County;

District 19:

Davidson County

VTD: 01-3 Temple Baptist Church

VTD: 01-5 Bordeaux Library

VTD: 01-6 Cathedral of Praise

VTD: 02-1 Haynes Middle School

VTD: 02-2 White's Creek Pk Fire Hall #25

VTD: 02-3 Hillhurst Baptist Church

VTD: 02-4 Hillhurst Baptist Church

VTD: 02-5 Looby Comm Ctr

VTD: 02-6 Northwest YMCA

VTD: 03-4 Alex Green School

VTD: 03-5 Bellshire Elem. School

VTD: 03-6 Old Brick Church School

VTD: 03-7 New Brick Church Middle School

VTD: 03-8 Davidson Academy

VTD: 04-1 Madison Station Senior Ctr

VTD: 04-3 Windland Retirement Center

VTD: 05-1 Kipp Academy

VTD: 05-2 Cleveland St. Park Comm Ctr

VTD: 05-3 Eastland Baptist Church

VTD: 05-4 McFerrin Park Comm. Ctr.

VTD: 05-5 Ross Elementary School

VTD: 06-1 Martha O'Bryan Center

VTD: 06-3 East Park Comm. Center

VTD: 06-5 Cora Howe Elem School

VTD: 07-3 Memorial Lutheran Church

VTD: 08-1 Tom Joy School

VTD: 08-2 Gra-Mar School

VTD: 10-5 Parkway Baptist Church

VTD: 13-2 Glengarry School

VTD: 15-5 Vultee Church of Christ

VTD: 16-2 Polk Ave Firehall #12

VTD: 16-3 Vultee Church of Christ

VTD: 16-4 Woodbine Cumberland Pres. Church

Blocks (017200): 2015 2016 2017 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2039 2040 2041

Blocks (017300): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3015 3016

VTD: 17-1 Napier Comm. Ctr

VTD: 17-2 Trevecca Towers

VTD: 17-3 Johnson Middle School

VTD: 17-8 Napier School

VTD: 17-9 Edgehill Library

VTD: 19-1 Buena Vista Elementary School

VTD: 19-2 15th Ave Baptist Church

VTD: 19-3 Watkins Park Comm Ctr

VTD: 19-4 Kayne Av Baptist Church

VTD: 19-5 Murrell School

VTD: 20-2 Union Hall 737

VTD: 21-1 Hadley Park Community Center

VTD: 21-2 Nashville Big Picture High School

VTD: 21-3 Pearl-Cohn High School

VTD: 21-6 McGruder Center

VTD: 24-4 Park Ave School

VTD: 26-1 Paragon Mills School

VTD: 28-1 Una Baptist Church

VTD: 28-3 Una Baptist Church

Blocks (015613): 4000 4007 4010

VTD: 28-4 Antioch Church of Christ

VTD: 28-5 Apollo Middle School

VTD: 29-1 Priest Lake Presbyterian

VTD: 29-2 Lakeview School

VTD: 29-3 Hamilton UMC

VTD: 30-2 Haywood Hills Baptist

VTD: 32-5 Antioch Middle School

VTD: 33-3 Southeast Library

VTD: 33-4 Hickory Hollow Baptist

VTD: 6-4 Main Library;

District 20:

Davidson County

VTD: 01-1 1st Baptist Church of Joelton

VTD: 01-2 Greenville UMC

VTD: 01-4 Scottsboro Comm. Ctr.

VTD: 03-1 Union Hill 1st Baptist Church

VTD: 03-2 Joelton Elem School

VTD: 09-1 Madison Park Comm. Ctr

VTD: 09-3 Neely's Bend Middle School

VTD: 10-1 Luton's UMC

VTD: 10-2 Walker Creek UMC

VTD: 10-3 Goodlettsville Comm. Ctr.

VTD: 10-4 First Baptist Church of Goodlettsville

VTD: 10-6 Gateway School

VTD: 11-1 Old Hickory Comm. Ctr.

VTD: 11-2 Lakewood City Hall

VTD: 11-3 Andrew Jackson School

Blocks (010502): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3042 3043 3044 3047 3048 3049

Blocks (015401): 1001 1007 2016

VTD: 14-1 Hermitage Hills Baptist

VTD: 14-2 Hermitage School

VTD: 14-3 TN School for the Blind

VTD: 14-5 Hickman School

VTD: 15-1 Two Rivers School

VTD: 15-2 Donelson Heights UMC

VTD: 15-3 Donelson Presbyterian Church

VTD: 16-4 Woodbine Cumberland Pres. Church

Blocks (980200): 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1051 1055 1059 1060 1061

VTD: 17-5 Berry Hill City Hall

VTD: 22-1 Bellevue Comm Ctr

VTD: 22-2 Bellevue Church of Christ

VTD: 22-3 Bellevue Middle School

VTD: 22-4 Bellevue UMC

VTD: 23-1 Brook Hollow Baptist

Blocks (018102): 1003 1004 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 3001 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037

Blocks (018201): 1001 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2008 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 3000 3001 3002 3005 3007

Blocks (018203): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2015 2016

Blocks (018301): 3010 3011

VTD: 23-2 West Meade School

VTD: 23-3 Jewish Community Ctr

VTD: 23-4 Belle Meade City Hall

VTD: 24-3 Westminister Presbyterian Church

VTD: 24-6 West End Middle School

VTD: 25-1 West End Middle School

VTD: 25-2 Boy Scouts of America

VTD: 25-5 Hillsboro High School

VTD: 25-6 YWCA

Blocks (017701): 2001 2002 2003 2006 2007 2008 2009 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017

Blocks (017702): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018

VTD: 26-4 Crievewood Baptist Church

VTD: 26-5 Ellington Agricultural Center

VTD: 27-2 Ellington Agricultural Center

VTD: 27-3 McMurray Middle School

VTD: 27-4 Christ Church

VTD: 31-1 Woodson Chapel Church of Christ

VTD: 31-2 Woodson Chapel Church of Christ

VTD: 31-4 Granbery Elementary School

VTD: 34-1 Calvary UMC

VTD: 34-10 Forest Hills Baptist

VTD: 34-2 Hillsboro Presbyterian Church

VTD: 34-3 Percy Priest School

VTD: 34-4 John Trotwood Moore School

VTD: 34-5 Brentwood Hills Church of Christ

VTD: 34-8 Glendale UMC

VTD: 35-1 Gower School

VTD: 35-2 South Harpeth Church of Christ

VTD: 35-3 Harpeth Valley School

VTD: 35-4 Bellevue UMC

VTD: 35-5 Jewish Comm. Ctr.;

District 21:

Davidson County

VTD: 04-2 Madison Library

VTD: 04-4 Windland Retirement Center

VTD: 06-2 Shelby Comm. Ctr.

VTD: 07-1 Stratford High School

VTD: 07-2 Dalewood UMC

VTD: 07-4 Cornelia Fort Air Park

VTD: 07-5 Aldergate UMC

VTD: 08-3 Brush Hill Cumberland Pres.

VTD: 08-4 Dalewood Baptist Church

VTD: 09-2 Madison Firehall

VTD: 13-1 Glencliff Presbyterian Church

VTD: 13-3 Vultee Firehall

VTD: 13-4 Whitworth Baptist Christ Church

VTD: 15-4 Margaret Allen School

VTD: 15-7 Margaret Allen School

VTD: 16-4 Woodbine Cumberland Pres. Church

Blocks (017200): 2032 2038 2042 2043 2050

VTD: 16-5 Woodbine Baptist Church

VTD: 16-6 Glencliff High School

VTD: 17-10 Sevier Park Comm Ctr

VTD: 17-4 Sevier Park Comm. Center

VTD: 17-6 Berry Headstart

VTD: 17-7 Knowles Senior Center

VTD: 18-1 Eakin Elementary

VTD: 18-2 Eakin Elementary

VTD: 18-3 Eakin Elementary

VTD: 18-6 Belmont University (Curb Event Center)

VTD: 18-7 Belmont Heights Baptist Church

VTD: 20-3 Union Hall 737

VTD: 20-4 Charlotte Park School

VTD: 21-4 Centennial Park Art Ctr.

VTD: 21-5 Centennial Park Art Ctr.

VTD: 23-1 Brook Hollow Baptist

Blocks (018102): 3000 3002

VTD: 24-1 Sylvan Park School

VTD: 24-2 TN Technology Center at Nashville

VTD: 24-5 McCabe Park Comm Ctr

VTD: 25-4 Granny White Church of Christ

VTD: 25-6 YWCA

Blocks (017702): 2002 2011 2020 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006

Blocks (017800): 2013 2014 2015 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009

VTD: 26-3 Norman Binkley School

VTD: 27-1 Church of the Holy Spirit

VTD: 28-3 Una Baptist Church

Blocks (015613): 4001

VTD: 29-4 Smith Springs Church of Christ

VTD: 30-1 Haywood School

VTD: 30-3 Grace Cole School

VTD: 30-4 Tusculum Hills Baptist Church

VTD: 31-3 Oasis Worship Centre

VTD: 32-1 Antioch UMC

VTD: 32-2 Bell Road Baptist

VTD: 32-3 Cane Ridge Comm. Ctr.

VTD: 32-4 Spirit of Life Church

VTD: 33-2 New Antioch High School

VTD: 34-9 Church of the Redeemer;

District 22:

Houston County

Montgomery County

Stewart County;

District 23:

Williamson County;

District 24:

Benton County

Carroll County

Gibson County

Henry County

Obion County

Weakley County;

District 25:

Cheatham County

Dickson County

Hickman County

Humphreys County

Robertson County;

District 26:

Chester County

Decatur County

Fayette County

Hardeman County

Hardin County

Haywood County

Henderson County

McNairy County;

District 27:

Crockett County

Dyer County

Lake County

Lauderdale County

Madison County;

District 28:

Giles County

Lawrence County

Lewis County

Maury County

Perry County

Wayne County;

District 29:

Shelby County

VTD: Locke

VTD: Lucy 1

VTD: Lucy 2

VTD: Lucy 3

VTD: McConnell's

VTD: Memphis 01

VTD: Memphis 02

VTD: Memphis 12

VTD: Memphis 15

VTD: Memphis 16-1

VTD: Memphis 17

VTD: Memphis 22

VTD: Memphis 25-2

VTD: Memphis 26-1

VTD: Memphis 28

VTD: Memphis 29-1

VTD: Memphis 29-2

VTD: Memphis 31-1

VTD: Memphis 31-2

VTD: Memphis 31-4

VTD: Memphis 33

VTD: Memphis 34-2

VTD: Memphis 35-1

VTD: Memphis 48

VTD: Memphis 49

VTD: Memphis 50-1

VTD: Memphis 60-1

VTD: Memphis 60-3

VTD: Memphis 60-4

VTD: Memphis 60-6

VTD: Memphis 60-8

VTD: Memphis 60-9

VTD: Memphis 61

VTD: Memphis 69-1

VTD: Memphis 69-2

VTD: Memphis 71-5

VTD: Memphis 75-1

VTD: Memphis 75-11

VTD: Memphis 75-5

VTD: Memphis 75-6

VTD: Memphis 75-7

VTD: Memphis 76-4

VTD: Memphis 76-5

VTD: Memphis 76-6

VTD: Memphis 77-1

VTD: Memphis 77-2

VTD: Memphis 77-3

VTD: Memphis 78-1

VTD: Memphis 78-3

VTD: Memphis 79-1

VTD: Memphis 79-2

VTD: Memphis 79-3

VTD: Memphis 79-7

VTD: Memphis 79-8

VTD: Memphis 82-1

VTD: Memphis 82-2

VTD: Memphis 82-3

VTD: Millington 1

VTD: Millington 2

VTD: Stewartville

Blocks (020210): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004

Blocks (020222): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1015 1016 1038

Blocks (020400): 2032

Blocks (020700): 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1029 1030

VTD: Woodstock 2;

District 30:

Shelby County

VTD: Bartlett 10

VTD: Bartlett 14

VTD: Memphis 11

VTD: Memphis 13

VTD: Memphis 20-1

VTD: Memphis 20-3

VTD: Memphis 21

VTD: Memphis 27

VTD: Memphis 32

VTD: Memphis 36-1

VTD: Memphis 36-2

VTD: Memphis 36-3

VTD: Memphis 37

VTD: Memphis 38-2

VTD: Memphis 40-1

VTD: Memphis 40-2

VTD: Memphis 41-1

VTD: Memphis 41-3

VTD: Memphis 42-1

VTD: Memphis 43-2

VTD: Memphis 52-1

VTD: Memphis 52-2

VTD: Memphis 52-3

VTD: Memphis 53-1

VTD: Memphis 53-2

VTD: Memphis 53-3

VTD: Memphis 54

VTD: Memphis 62-0

VTD: Memphis 63-2

VTD: Memphis 68-1

VTD: Memphis 68-2

Blocks (009200): 5003

VTD: Memphis 70-1

VTD: Memphis 70-2

VTD: Memphis 70-3

VTD: Memphis 71-3

VTD: Memphis 71-4

VTD: Memphis 72-1

VTD: Memphis 72-3

VTD: Memphis 72-5

VTD: Memphis 72-7

VTD: Memphis 80-2

Blocks (009200): 3046 5000 5001 5002 5031 5032

Blocks (021311): 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1034 1042 1043 1044 1045

Blocks (021320): 2006 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3009 3025 3028 3029 3030

VTD: Memphis 81-1

VTD: Memphis 81-4

Blocks (021320): 2007 2008 2009 2010 2012 2013 2014

VTD: Memphis 81-6

VTD: Memphis 83

VTD: Memphis 84-1

VTD: Memphis 84-2

VTD: Memphis 86

VTD: Memphis 87-1

VTD: Memphis 87-3

VTD: Memphis 88-3

VTD: Memphis 88-4

VTD: Memphis 88-5

VTD: Memphis 90-1

VTD: Memphis 90-2

VTD: Memphis 90-3;

District 31:

Shelby County

VTD: Cordova 10

VTD: Cordova 3

VTD: Cordova 4

VTD: Cordova 5

VTD: Cordova 6

VTD: Cordova 9

VTD: Germantown 01

VTD: Germantown 02

VTD: Germantown 03

VTD: Germantown 04

VTD: Germantown 05

VTD: Germantown 06

VTD: Germantown 08

VTD: Germantown 09

VTD: Germantown 10

VTD: Germantown 11

VTD: Germantown 12

VTD: Memphis 44-1

VTD: Memphis 44-2

VTD: Memphis 44-3

VTD: Memphis 44-4

VTD: Memphis 44-5

VTD: Memphis 45-1

VTD: Memphis 45-4

VTD: Memphis 55-1

VTD: Memphis 55-2

VTD: Memphis 56-1

VTD: Memphis 57

VTD: Memphis 64

VTD: Memphis 67-3

Blocks (009500): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4033

VTD: Memphis 68-2

Blocks (009200): 4011 4012 4013 4026 4027 4028 5004 5005 5006 5007 5008 5009 5010 5011 5016 5025 5026 5027 5028

Blocks (009600): 1005 1010 2000 2001 2002 2007 2008 2009

VTD: Memphis 68-3

VTD: Memphis 74-6

VTD: Memphis 80-2

Blocks (021311): 1000 1001 1002 1008 1041 1046 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028

Blocks (021312): 1000 1001 1002 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1012 1013 1014 1015 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2017

Blocks (021320): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2011

Blocks (021410): 1002 1003 1005 1028 1029

VTD: Memphis 81-2

VTD: Memphis 81-3

VTD: Memphis 81-4

Blocks (021320): 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023

VTD: Memphis 81-7

VTD: Memphis 89-1

VTD: Memphis 89-2

VTD: Memphis 91-1

VTD: Memphis 91-2

VTD: Memphis 91-3

VTD: Memphis 95-1

VTD: Memphis 95-2

VTD: Memphis 95-3

VTD: Memphis 95-5

VTD: Memphis 95-6

VTD: Memphis 95-7

VTD: Memphis 96-01

VTD: Morning Sun 01

VTD: Morning Sun 02;

District 32:

Shelby County

VTD: ARL-01

VTD: ARL-02

VTD: Bartlett 02

VTD: Bartlett 03

VTD: Bartlett 04

VTD: Bartlett 05

VTD: Bartlett 06

VTD: Bartlett 08

VTD: Bartlett 09

VTD: Bartlett 11

VTD: Bartlett 12

VTD: Bartlett 13

VTD: Brunswick 1

VTD: Brunswick 2

VTD: Collierville 09

VTD: Collierville 1

VTD: Collierville 2

VTD: Collierville 3

VTD: Collierville 4

VTD: Collierville 5

VTD: Collierville 6

VTD: Collierville 7

VTD: Eads

VTD: Forest Hills 2

Blocks (021520): 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1064 1065 1066 1067 2162 2163 2164 2165 2166 2167 2220 2221

VTD: Kerrville

VTD: Lakeland 1

VTD: Lakeland 2

VTD: Memphis 88-2

VTD: Stewartville

Blocks (020644): 1000

Blocks (020700): 1028 1031 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021

Blocks (020810): 1024 1025 1026 1027 1038 1039 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042

Blocks (020820): 1000

Tipton County;

District 33:

Shelby County

VTD: Capleville 1

VTD: Capleville 5

VTD: Forest Hills 1

VTD: Forest Hills 2

Blocks (021510): 1020 1030 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071

VTD: Memphis 45-2

VTD: Memphis 46-1

VTD: Memphis 46-2

VTD: Memphis 47-1

VTD: Memphis 56-3

VTD: Memphis 58-1

VTD: Memphis 58-4

VTD: Memphis 59-1

VTD: Memphis 59-5

VTD: Memphis 60-2

VTD: Memphis 60-5

VTD: Memphis 60-7

VTD: Memphis 65-1

VTD: Memphis 66

VTD: Memphis 67-1

VTD: Memphis 67-3

Blocks (009500): 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024

VTD: Memphis 73-1

VTD: Memphis 73-3

VTD: Memphis 73-4

VTD: Memphis 74-1

VTD: Memphis 74-2

VTD: Memphis 74-4

VTD: Memphis 74-5

VTD: Memphis 74-9

VTD: Memphis 81-5

VTD: Memphis 92-1

VTD: Memphis 92-2

VTD: Memphis 93-1

VTD: Memphis 93-2

VTD: Memphis 93-3

VTD: Memphis 94-2

VTD: Memphis 94-3

VTD: Memphis 94-5

VTD: Memphis 94-7

VTD: Memphis 94-8

VTD: Ross Store 01

VTD: Ross Store 05

VTD: Ross Store 13

VTD: Ross Store 14

VTD: Ross Store 16

It is the legislative intent that all senate districts shall be contiguous and contiguity by water is sufficient, and, toward that end, if any voting district or other geographical entity designated as a portion of a senate district is found to be noncontiguous with the larger portion of the senate district, it shall be constituted a portion of the senate district smallest in population to which it is contiguous.

A candidate for election to the office of senator shall be required to reside in the senatorial district from which such candidate seeks to be elected for one (1) year immediately preceding the election.

County election commissions shall, with the assistance of the office of local government, redraw or establish any precinct lines to ensure that there will be no split precincts in legislative districts.

Any subsequent reapportionment of county legislative bodies shall not affect these legislative districts.

It is the intention of the general assembly in passing a plan apportioning the state senatorial districts to do so in a manner which complies with the constitutional mandates of the United States Constitution and the Constitution of Tennessee and applicable judicial decisions.

Acts 1931, ch. 3, § 17; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 172.17; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-302; Acts 1981, ch. 538, § 1; 1982, ch. 909, §§ 1, 2; 1982, ch. 944, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 275, § 1; 1984, ch. 753, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 92, §§ 1-3; 1987, ch. 249, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 437, § 1; 1991, ch. 373, § 2; 1992, ch. 826, § 1; 1995, ch. 50, §§ 1, 2; 2002, ch. 466, § 1; 2012, ch. 514, §§ 1-4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 50, § 2, which added to the description of Senate District 21 the VTD “26-2B”, further noted that that district, which is composed entirely of the city of Berry Hill, has been redesignated by the Davidson County Election Commission as VTD 17-4.

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. District to be represented by a qualified voter of that district, Tenn. Const., art. II, § 6a.

Districts of substantially equal population required, districts to be reapportioned as needed, Tenn. Const., art. II, § 4.

Residence requirements for representative candidates, §3-1-104.

Splitting precincts, §2-3-102.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Census, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability, OAG 90-61 (5/16/90).